Wisconsin, session 2025, SB283.
do enact as follows:SB283,13Section 1. 85.65 of the statutes is created to read:SB283,2,3485.65 Public protective services hearing protection assistance. (1) 1The department shall establish and administer a public protective services hearing 2protection program. Under the program, the department shall do all of the 3following:SB283,2,54(a) Obtain from a manufacturer of the product hearing protection devices that 5satisfy sub. (2).SB283,2,76(b) Upon request, provide devices obtained under par. (a) to law enforcement 7and fire protective agencies in this state in the number requested by the agency.SB283,2,98(2) Devices under sub. (1) (a) shall be commercially available hearing 9protection devices that satisfy all of the following:SB283,2,1010(a) The device is designed to be used multiple times.SB283,2,1111(b) The device is designed to be inserted completely within the ear canal.SB283,2,1212(c) The device has a minimum noise reduction rating of 25 decibels.SB283,2,1313(d) The device has a maximum output of 80 decibels.SB283,2,1614(3) A law enforcement or fire protective agency may request any number of 15devices under sub. (1) (b) that the agency determines are necessary for the agency’s 16use.SB283,2,1717